Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.120

Operating without license—Penalty.

Any person operating or maintaining any birthing center without a license under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.

[ 2000 c 93 s 38; 1951 c 168 s 13.]